Delaware, session 153, HB230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Three-fourths of all members
elected to each house thereof concurring therein):
Section 1. Funds are hereby appropriated to the following Government Units and Senior Centers in the amounts listed:

Account Code Organization/Description Amount
(25-01-01) Office of the Secretary
County Seat Package $ 3,880,543

TOTAL - Office of the Secretary $ 3,880,543

(35-05-30) Public Health, Emergency Medical Services
Paramedic Program Operations $ 17,086,654 $ 18,275,620
Paramedic Program Operations Block Grant $ 3,000,000

TOTAL - Public Health, Emergency Medical Services $ 21,275,620
Page 1 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Account Code Organization/Description Amount
(35-14-01) Services for Aging and Adults with Physical Disabilities
Administration/Community Services, Senior Centers

NEW CASTLE COUNTY
Absalom Jones $ 236,308 $ 245,225
Brandywine $ 280,642 $ 290,446
Chesapeake & Delaware $ 180,158 $ 187,498
Cornerstone $ 151,965 $ 158,741
DeLaWarr $ 261,465 $ 270,431
Howard Weston $ 504,931 $ 525,511
Jewish Community Center $ 171,888 $ 179,517
Mid-County $ 328,407 $ 342,661
M.O.T. $ 323,613 $ 337,771
New Castle $ 192,196 $ 201,070
Newark $ 505,288 $ 526,972
Oak Grove $ 248,232 $ 256,251
Sellers $ 190,691 $ 198,241
TOTAL $ 3,575,784 $ 3,720,335

KENT COUNTY
Frederica $ 221,164 $ 230,730
Harrington $ 148,992 $ 154,853
Harvest Years $ 131,953 $ 137,473
Lillian Smith $ 90,274 $ 94,374
Mamie Warren $ 209,064 $ 216,828
Milford $ 240,240 $ 250,530
Modern Maturity Center $ 583,482 $ 606,016
TOTAL $ 1,625,169 $ 1,690,804

SUSSEX COUNTY
Bridgeville $ 179,545 $ 186,445
Cape Henlopen $ 243,408 $ 252,621
Georgetown CHEER $ 143,128 $ 149,921
Greenwood CHEER $ 151,900 $ 158,869
Indian River $ 191,305 $ 198,440
Laurel $ 280,886 $ 290,434
Lewes $ 148,337 $ 159,883
Lewes Harbour Lights CHEER $ 239,905 $ 248,634
Long Neck Pelican Cove CHEER $ 183,017 $ 190,608
Milton CHEER $ 150,865 $ 157,813
Nanticoke $ 278,763 $ 292,917
Ocean View CHEER $ 152,432 $ 159,826
Roxana CHEER $ 154,309 $ 161,326
TOTAL $ 2,497,800 $ 2,607,737

CITY OF WILMINGTON
Clarence Fraim $ 229,369 $ 236,937
Claymore $ 264,243 $ 271,102
Jimmy Jenkins $ 114,202 $ 118,060
Los Abuelos $ 68,785 $ 71,262
Peoples Settlement $ 107,188 $ 110,607
Saint Anthony's $ 194,911 $ 201,989
Saint Patrick's $ 198,211 $ 205,156
West Center City $ 115,457 $ 119,042
Wilmington $ 211,720 $ 217,925
TOTAL $ 1,504,086 $ 1,552,080

TOTAL - Senior Centers $ 9,202,839 $ 9,570,956
Page 2 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Account Code Organization/Description Amount
(45-01-01) Office of the Secretary, Administration
State Aid to Local Law Enforcement (SALLE) $ 368,347 $ 372,000
Emergency Illegal Drug Enforcement (EIDE) $ 245,565 $ 249,000
Local Police Coordination (PCC) $ 88,000 $ 95,000
Higher Education Public Safety Fund $ 3,650,000 $ 1,650,000

TOTAL - Office of the Secretary, Administration $ 4,351,912 $ 2,366,000

TOTAL ‑ Section 1 - Government Units and Senior Centers $ 34,521,948 $ 37,093,119

Section 2. Funds are hereby appropriated to the following Grant-in-Aid recipients in the amounts listed:
Category/Description Amount

One-Times
Adult Basic Education $ 40,000
Child Care Licensing System (95-01-06) $ 750,000
Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention (35-05-20) $ 100,000
Collaborative for Innovation in Delaware Corporate Governance (02-17-01) $ 200,000
Community Empowerment Project - Prices Run Originals Festival $ 5,000
Community Health Contingency (35-01-10) $ 5,000,000 $ 2,000,000
Delaware Grocery Initiative (20-10-01) $ 250,000
Delaware Interscholastic Athletic Association (DIAA) - Technology Updates (95-01-03) $ 100,000
Delaware Nursing Home Residents Quality Assurance Commission (02-18-07) $ 8,500
Delaware Restaurant Association Educational Foundation $ 50,000
Delaware School Based Health Alliance $ 150,000 $ 107,500
Delaware State Parks - First State Heritage Park (40-03-02) $ 20,000
Delaware State University (90-03-01) $ 2,500,000
Dover Century Club $ 7,500
Elevate Vocal Arts Delaware Academy of Vocal Arts $ 10,000
Financial Literacy Study (95-03-15) $ 200,000
Food Bank of Delaware $ 250,000
Government Performance Reviews (10-02-11) $ 500,000
Health Care Contingency (35-02-01) $ 5,000,000
Healthcare Workforce (10-02-11) $ 250,000
Housing Repair and Modification Fund (10-08-01) $ 150,000
Ingleside Homes $ 100,000
Inner City Cultural League $ 45,000
Juvenile Civil Citation (10-07-02) $ 468,176
Kent County Levy Court - Paramedics $ 1,000,000
Kind to Kids Foundation $ 250,000 $ 200,000
Kingswood Community Center $ 10,000
Master of Social Work Program (90-01-01) $ 700,000
Medical Debt Relief (10-02-11) $ 500,000
Minority Engineering Regional Incentive Training (MERIT) Pathways to Success $ 40,000
New Castle County - Paramedics $ 1,000,000
New Castle County Police $ 160,000
North Wilmington Public Library (20-08-01) $ 350,000
Public Education Funding Commission (95-01-05) $ 250,000
Right to Representation (02-17-01) $ 550,000
Salary/OEC Contingency Education Custodians (10-02-11) $ 1,171,700
Statewide Fire Companies and Public Service Ambulance Companies $ 6,400,000 $ 3,200,000
Sussex County Council - Paramedics $ 1,000,000
Town of Smyrna - Smyrna Clayton Veterans Memorial $ 8,000
Veterans of Foreign Wars, Post 8801 $ 8,000
Vietnam Veterans of America, Chapter 83 $ 8,000
TOTAL - One-Times $ 21,500,700 $ 13,866,676
Page 3 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Aging
Boys & Girls Club of Delaware - Elder Swim $ 83,640
Bridgeville Senior Center $ 9,000
Cape Henlopen Senior Center $ 10,510 $ 10,700
CHEER $ 312,000 $ 325,000
Delaware Senior Olympics $ 37,740 $ 40,000
Greater Lewes Community Village $ 10,000
Harrington Senior Center $ 22,950 $ 24,000
Harvest Years Senior Center - Shopping Program $ 46,000 $ 47,500
Ingleside Homes $ 66,300 $ 69,000
Lillian Smith Senior Center $ 7,100 $ 10,000
Lorelton Foundation $ 10,000
Lutheran Senior Services of Dover $ 10,000 $ 15,000
Mamie A. Warren Senior Center $ 10,000
Meals on Wheels of Lewes and Rehoboth $ 82,500
Ministry of Caring - Frances Norton Community Center $ 61,200
Modern Maturity Center $ 265,000 $ 272,950
Nanticoke Senior Center $ 45,900 $ 50,000
Newark Senior Center - Homebound Meals $ 30,600 $ 32,000
Police Athletic League of Wilmington - Senior Program $ 87,500
prAmere Events $ 2,000
Senior Center Transportation Services $ 1,683,329
Slaughter Neck Community Action Organization $ 52,157 $ 54,000
St. Anthony's Community Center - City Fare $ 81,600 $ 85,000
Wilmington Senior Center $ 10,000
TOTAL - Aging $ 1,173,040 $ 2,929,479

Arts/Historical/Cultural/Tourism Arts, Historical, or Recreation
1st Delaware Regiment Living History Corporation $ 5,000
African American Heritage Center of Delaware $ 15,000
Afro-American Historical Society of Delaware $ 10,000
Archaeological Society of Delaware $ 8,240
August Quarterly Festival Committee $ 62,000
Chinese American Community Center $ 13,000
City of Delaware City - Delaware City Day Committee $ 36,050
City of Harrington - Parks and Recreation Department $ 41,000 $ 39,000
City of New Castle - Separation Day $ 36,050 $ 60,000
Cityfest $ 30,000 $ 47,750
Delaware Academy of Science $ 40,000
Delaware Agricultural Museum $ 135,000 $ 150,000
Delaware Botanic Gardens $ 5,000
Delaware Children's Museum $ 90,000
Delaware Contemporary $ 20,000
Delaware Greenways $ 32,569
Delaware Juneteenth Association $ 63,000
Delaware Military Heritage and Education Foundation $ 25,000
Delaware Museum of Nature and Science $ 17,000
Delaware Preservation Fund $ 30,000
Delaware Sports Museum and Hall of Fame $ 25,000
Delaware State Fair $ 154,500 $ 170,000
Delaware State Police Museum $ 35,000 $ 55,000
Delaware Symphony Orchestra $ 5,000
Delaware Zoological Society $ 12,500
Diamond State Black Film Festival $ 12,500 $ 25,000
Dover Art League $ 18,000 $ 20,000
Duck Creek Historical Society $ 35,000
Fort Delaware Society $ 18,000
Fort Miles Historical Association $ 108,000
Page 4 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Friends of Auburn Heights $ 5,000
Friends of Cooch's Bridge Historic Site $ 8,500 $ 15,000
Friends of Historic Camden $ 7,500
Friends of Milford Museum $ 8,000
Friends of the African Union Church Cemetery $ 20,000
Friends of the Claymont Stone School $ 20,000
Friends of White Clay Creek State Park $ 5,000
Friends of Wilmington Parks $ 22,000
Greater Harrington Historical Society $ 23,000
Greenbank Mill Associates $ 10,000
Historic Georgetown Association $ 5,000
Historic Red Clay Valley $ 30,000
Historical Society of Delaware $ 150,000
Holy Trinity Old Swedes Foundation $ 8,200
Inner City Cultural League $ 75,000 $ 120,000
Jewish Federation of Delaware $ 80,000 $ 100,000
Kalmar Nyckel Foundation $ 67,800
Lewes Base Ball Club $ 4,000
Lewes Historical Society $ 42,500
Little League Senior Softball World Series $ 20,000 $ 35,000
Milford Historical Society $ 10,000
Music School of Delaware $ 17,130
Nanticoke Indians Association $ 30,000
New Castle Historical Society $ 15,450
Newark Arts Alliance $ 5,000
Old Brandywine Village $ 20,600
Overfalls Foundation $ 10,000
People to People International $ 6,000
Port Penn Historical Society $ 5,000
Preservation Delaware $ 7,500
Quaker Hill Historic Preservation Foundation $ 5,000
Redding House Foundation $ 6,000
Rehoboth Beach Historical Society $ 30,000
Seaford Historical Society $ 9,229 $ 13,729
Sister Cities of Wilmington $ 8,240
Smyrna-Clayton Heritage Association $ 12,000
Smyrna-Clayton July 4th Association $ 12,000
Sussex County Return Day $ 25,000
TOTAL - Arts/Historical/Cultural/Tourism Arts, Historical, or Recreation $ 2,896,272 $ 2,114,758

Economic, Housing, or Labor Services
1212 Corporation $ 60,000
Better Homes of Seaford $ 27,000 $ 28,000
Central Baptist Community Development Corporation $ 75,300
Central Delaware Habitat for Humanity $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Central Delaware Housing Collaborative $ 25,000 $ 40,000
Challenge Program $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Claymont Renaissance Development Corporation $ 30,000 $ 50,000
Community Education Building $ 10,000 $ 10,300
Community Resource Center $ 5,000 $ 5,150
Cornerstone West Community Development Corporation $ 12,000 $ 12,240
Delaware Center for Justice $ 179,400
Delaware Manufactured Homeowners Association $ 14,000 $ 14,500
Delaware Restaurant Association Educational Foundation $ 10,000 $ 11,000
Delaware State CLT Diamond State CLT $ 5,000
Delmarva Clergy United in Social Action Foundation $ 8,000
Dover Interfaith Mission for Housing $ 50,000 $ 75,000
Family Promise of Northern New Castle County $ 21,000 $ 23,000
Page 5 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Family Promise of Southern Delaware $ 10,000 $ 11,000
Gateway House $ 10,500 $ 10,900
Good Neighbors Home Repair $ 6,000
Habitat for Humanity of New Castle County $ 5,300 $ 5,750
HELP Initiative $ 5,000
Hispanic American Association of Delaware $ 10,000
Housing Alliance Delaware $ 51,500 $ 55,000
Housing Opportunity of Northern Delaware Housing Opportunities of Northern Delaware $ 30,000
Interfaith Community Housing of Delaware $ 5,000 $ 5,150
Jobs for Delaware Graduates $ 1,395,197
Labor Economic Education emPowerment $ 30,000 $ 31,000
Laurel Redevelopment Corporation $ 5,000 $ 5,150
Leadership Delaware $ 10,300 $ 11,000
Maritime Exchange for the Delaware River and Bay $ 150,000
Milford Housing Development Corporation $ 82,500 $ 90,000
Nehemiah Gateway Community Development Corporation $ 65,196 $ 68,000
NeighborGood Partners $ 82,500 $ 90,000
Project New Start $ 16,000 $ 17,000
SCORE Delaware $ 12,250 $ 13,000
Shepherd Place $ 60,000 $ 75,000
Sojourners Place $ 55,000 $ 120,000
Spur Impact Association $ 5,000 $ 5,150
Supportive Transitional & Emergency Housing Ministry (STEHM) $ 42,000 $ 43,260
Sussex Community Crisis Housing Services $ 45,000 $ 46,350
Sussex County Habitat for Humanity $ 14,000 $ 15,000
Teen Warehouse $ 35,000 $ 100,000
The Way Home $ 105,200 $ 110,000
Veterans Watchmaker Initiative $ 6,000
Warriors Helping Warriors $ 11,000 $ 13,500
Wilmington HOPE Commission $ 355,000 $ 365,650
World Trade Center Delaware $ 350,000 $ 360,500
TOTAL - Economic, Housing, or Labor Services $ 3,912,447

Family and Youth Services
100 Black Men of Delaware $ 5,000
A Better Chance for Our Children $ 40,000
ARK Educational Consulting $ 5,100
Beau Biden Foundation for the Protection of Children $ 7,000 $ 15,000
Big Brothers Big Sisters of Delaware $ 76,500
Boys & Girls Clubs of Delaware $ 1,089,771 $ 1,200,000
Brandywinebots Robotics Club $ 5,000 $ 7,000
Breaking Barriers $ 15,000
Camp Barnes $ 58,830
CHILD, Inc. $ 1,253,900 $ 1,469,389
Children & Families First Delaware $ 825,650
Children's Advocacy Center of Delaware $ 1,136,800
Choir School of Delaware $ 12,000 $ 13,000
Civil Air Patrol $ 17,000 $ 20,000
Communities In Schools Delaware $ 250,000 $ 255,000
Connecting Generations $ 414,000 $ 415,000
Delaware Adolescent Program $ 896,000
Delaware Aerospace Education Foundation $ 100,000
Delaware Afro-American Sports Hall of Fame $ 7,500
Delaware Center for Geographic Education $ 50,000
Delaware Council on Economic Education $ 57,250
Delaware Ecumenical Council on Children & Families $ 50,000
Delaware Futures $ 50,000 $ 60,000
Delaware Guidance Services for Children & Youth $ 275,200
Page 6 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Delaware Institute for the Arts in Education $ 126,000 $ 130,000
Delaware Law Related Education Center $ 25,000
Delaware Multicultural and Civic Organization (DEMCO) $ 70,000 $ 72,000
Delaware Wrestling Alliance $ 80,000
Diamond State Classic Foundation $ 15,000
Duffy’s Hope $ 160,000 $ 201,000
EDGE for Tomorrow $ 5,000
Elizabeth W. Murphey School $ 135,000 $ 160,000
Engineer Early Association $ 10,000
First State Squash $ 9,000
Forum to Advance Minorities in Engineering (FAME) $ 322,500 $ 325,500
Girl Scouts of the Chesapeake Bay $ 91,500 $ 93,500
Girls Inc. of Delaware $ 231,130 $ 230,000
Gloves Against Drugs Foundation $ 7,500 $ 8,000
Green Beret Project $ 82,500 $ 100,000
Harry K Foundation $ 9,000
Healthy Foods for Healthy Kids $ 42,000 $ 42,670
Hilltop Lutheran Neighborhood Center $ 165,000 $ 170,500
Hugh O’Brian Youth Foundation of Delaware $ 4,500 $ 5,170
Junior Achievement of Delaware $ 107,000 $ 107,500
Kappa Mainstream Leadership $ 42,000
Kind to Kids Foundation $ 50,000 $ 50,660
More Than Fitness $ 60,000 $ 80,000
Multiplying Good $ 5,150
New Castle Prevention Coalition $ 25,000 $ 25,500
New Hope Recreation and Development Center $ 16,500 $ 16,900
Pet-Assisted Visitation Volunteer Services $ 10,750
Peter Spencer Family Life Foundation $ 98,000 $ 98,500
Police Athletic League of Delaware $ 200,000 $ 200,500
Police Athletic League of Dover $ 35,000 $ 40,000
Police Athletic League of Wilmington $ 150,204 $ 156,500
Prevent Child Abuse Delaware $ 57,500 $ 58,000
Project Reach Out $ 7,500 $ 10,000
Read Aloud Delaware $ 244,000 $ 250,000
Reading Assist Institute $ 375,000
Reed's Refuge Center $ 7,500 $ 20,000
Richard Allen Coalition $ 40,000
Safe Kids Delaware $ 21,000
Sam's KIDS $ 5,000
School Nutrition AgriCulture (SNAC) Garden Foundation $ 6,500 $ 6,600
Supporting Kidds $ 5,000 $ 7,000
TeenSHARP $ 5,000 $ 5,000
Tomaros Change $ 5,000 $ 5,500
Urban Promise Wilmington $ 30,000 $ 45,000
Urban Youth Golf Program Association $ 55,570
West End Neighborhood House $ 135,000 $ 160,000
West Side New Beginnings $ 3,000 $ 3,500
Women and Children Transformation Ministry International $ 15,000 $ 20,000
Zoe Ministries $ 51,500 $ 57,500
TOTAL - Family and Youth Services $ 10,906,090 $ 10,642,939

Disabled/Health/Labor Health or Disability Services
321 Foundation $ 18,000 $ 20,000
Adult Special Education Program $ 53,960
AIDS Delaware $ 65,000 $ 75,000
ALS Association Greater Philadelphia Chapter $ 47,875
Alzheimer's Association - Delaware Valley Chapter $ 45,000
Amanecer Counseling & Resource Center $ 12,605
Page 7 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

American Lung Association $ 15,500
ARC of Delaware $ 20,000
Art Works for All $ 18,000
atTAcK addiction $ 140,669
Autism Delaware $ 26,500 $ 29,000
Best Buddies $ 60,000
Blindsight Delaware $ 62,283
Brain Injury Association of Delaware $ 15,000
Brandywine Counseling & Community Services $ 25,000 $ 35,000
CAMP Rehoboth $ 38,000
Cancer Care Connection $ 7,500
Cancer Support Community Delaware $ 20,000
Center for Therapeutic and Educational Riding $ 30,000 $ 35,000
Children's Beach House $ 100,000
Children's Hospital of Philadelphia Poison Control Center $ 136,620
Collaborative Effort to Reinforce Transition Success $ 7,500
Community Collaboration of Delaware $ 15,000
Community Integrated Services $ 7,500
Delaware Association for Blind Athletes $ 10,000
Delaware Association for Children of Alcoholics $ 59,775 $ 50,000
Delaware Breast Cancer Coalition $ 45,000
Delaware Care Plan $ 8,000
Delaware Foundation Reaching Citizens (DFRC) $ 45,407
Delaware HIV Services $ 15,500
Delaware Hospice $ 261,977
Delaware School Based Health Alliance $ 5,000 $ 15,000
Delmarva Adult & Teen Challenge - Home of Hope $ 606,388 $ 653,727
Down Syndrome Association of Delaware $ 117,500
Easterseals - Delaware & Maryland Eastern Shore $ 330,000
Embrace Delaware $ 7,500
Endless Possibilities In The Community (EPIC) $ 10,000
Epilepsy Foundation of Delaware $ 49,847
Exceptional Care for Children $ 58,000
Gift of Life Donor Program $ 40,000
Goodwill of Delaware and Delaware County $ 17,800
Holcomb Associates $ 110,257
House of Pride $ 25,000
Independent Resources $ 8,000
Jay's House $ 2,500
Jewish Family Services of Delaware $ 90,000 $ 200,000
Junior League of Wilmington $ 6,000
Kent-Sussex Industries $ 147,500 $ 158,113
La Red Health Center $ 49,500
Limen House $ 130,000
Lori's Hands $ 7,500 $ 9,000
Make-A-Wish Philadelphia, Delaware & Susquehanna Valley $ 60,000
Mary Campbell Center $ 277,500 $ 287,500
Mental Health Association in Delaware $ 80,000
Ministry of Caring - Dental Office $ 25,000
National Alliance for the Mentally Ill $ 145,000
Nemours Foundation $ 50,000
Paralyzed Veterans of America - Colonial Chapter , Colonial Chapter $ 53,400
Parent Information Center of Delaware $ 10,201
Planned Parenthood of Delaware $ 47,000 $ 52,000
Ronald McDonald House of Delaware $ 54,000
Southbridge Medical Advisory Council $ 117,724
Southern Delaware Therapeutic and Recreational Horseback Riding $ 10,000 $ 15,000
Special Olympics Delaware $ 90,000
Page 8 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Survivors of Abuse in Recovery $ 90,000
Tech Impact $ 5,000
Tova Community Health $ 280,280 $ 285,280
Waggies by Maggie & Friends $ 15,000 $ 20,000
Westside Family Healthcare $ 140,000 $ 200,000
Yes U Can Corporation $ 12,500
TOTAL - Disabled/Health/Labor Health or Disability Services $ 4,963,571 $ 5,010,544

Alcohol/Substance Abuse
Catholic Charities - Substance Abuse & Outpatient Services $ 95,000
TOTAL - Alcohol/Substance Abuse $ 1,407,089

Neighborhood/Community Services Neighborhood and Community Services
American Red Cross Delmarva Chapter $ 86,000
Bellevue Community Center $ 375,000
Bernard and Ruth Siegel Jewish Community Center $ 16,130 $ 17,100
Brandywine Community Resource Council $ 499,000
Brandywine River Restoration Trust $ 10,000
Catholic Charities $ 125,000 $ 220,000
Charity Crossing $ 5,000
City of Love Church $ 40,000
Community Design Center $ 32,000
Community Legal Aid Society $ 338,340 $ 343,340
ContactLifeline $ 103,000
CSO - Commodore Center $ 40,000
Delaware Center for Horticulture $ 50,000
Delaware Center for Inland Bays $ 223,074 $ 235,074
Delaware City Community Center $ 39,000
Delaware Coalition Against Domestic Violence $ 21,292 $ 23,292
Delaware Coalition Against Gun Violence $ 10,500 $ 12,500
Delaware Community Reinvestment Action Council $ 15,000
Delaware Crime Stoppers $ 105,000
Delaware Humanities Forum $ 41,604 $ 46,604
Delaware Nature Society $ 160,000 $ 162,000
Delaware Public Media $ 250,000 $ 252,000
Delaware Rural Water Association $ 15,000 $ 17,000
Delaware Safety Council $ 65,000 $ 67,000
Delaware Volunteer Legal Services $ 112,200 $ 114,200
Delmarva Public Radio $ 8,240 $ 10,240
DETV Foundation $ 5,000
Do Care Doula Foundation $ 5,000
Donate Delaware $ 5,000
Downtown Dover Partnership $ 250,000 $ 100,000
Elevated Community Development Corporation $ 5,000
Faithful Friends Animal Society $ 102,000 $ 105,000
First State Community Action $ 154,000
Food Bank of Delaware $ 250,000 $ 257,000
Gumboro Community Center $ 30,000
Hope Dining Room $ 6,000
Humane Animal Partners $ 50,000 $ 60,000
Interdenominational Ministerial Alliance of Dover & Vicinity $ 30,000 $ 37,500
Kingswood Community Center $ 220,500 $ 222,500
La Esperanza Center $ 55,000 $ 57,000
Latin American Community Center $ 184,000 $ 186,000
Literacy Delaware $ 12,000
Love Inc of Mid-Delmarva $ 11,000
Lutheran Community Services $ 18,500 $ 110,000
Marine Education, Research and Rehabilitation Institute $ 18,000 $ 20,000
Page 9 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Martin Luther King Center $ 140,000
Metropolitan Wilmington Urban League $ 110,500
Ministry of Caring $ 685,000 $ 776,200
Missed Opts $ 42,500
Nanticoke River Watershed Conservancy $ 11,000 $ 13,000
Neighborhood House $ 211,000 $ 213,000
New Knollwood Community Center $ 85,000
Our Daily Bread Dining Room $ 5,100
Partnership for the Delaware Estuary $ 62,424 $ 65,500
People's Community Center $ 65,000 $ 85,000
People's Place II $ 1,173,300 $ 1,338,100
Plastic Free Delaware $ 17,250 $ 22,000
Rose Hill Community Center $ 270,000 $ 272,000
Salvation Army $ 187,000
Southern Delaware Horse Retirement Association $ 4,500
St. Patrick's Center $ 40,000
Tri-State Bird Rescue & Research $ 50,000 $ 55,000
USO Delaware $ 50,000 $ 52,000
What Is Your Voice $ 5,500 $ 6,500
WHYY $ 180,000 $ 190,000
YMCA of Delaware $ 235,000 $ 300,000
YWCA Delaware $ 403,000 $ 406,000
TOTAL - Neighborhood/Community Services Neighborhood and Community Services $ 8,796,663 $ 8,616,650

TOTAL - Section 2 - One-Times and Community Agencies $ 51,643,425 $ 47,093,493

Section 3. (a) There is appropriated to the listed fire companies the following sums to be used for the prevention and
extinguishment of fires throughout the State and for the maintenance of apparatus and equipment:

New Castle County
Aetna Hose, Hook and Ladder Co. Newark $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Belvedere Volunteer Fire Co. Belvedere $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Brandywine Hundred Fire Co. No. 1 Bellefonte $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Christiana Fire Co. Christiana $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Claymont Fire Co. Claymont $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Cranston Heights Fire Co. Cranston Heights $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Delaware City Fire Co. Delaware City $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Elsmere Fire Co. Elsmere $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Five Points Fire Co. No. 1 Richardson Park $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Good Will Fire Co. No. 1 New Castle $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Hockessin Fire Co. Hockessin $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Holloway Terrace Fire Co. Holloway Terrace $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Mill Creek Fire Co. Marshallton $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Minquadale Fire Co. Minquadale $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Minquas Fire Co. No. 1 Newport $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Odessa Fire Co. Odessa $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Port Penn Volunteer Fire Co. Port Penn $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Talleyville Fire Co. Talleyville $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Townsend Fire Co. Townsend $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Volunteer Hose Co. Middletown $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Wilmington Manor Volunteer Fire Co. Wilmington Manor $ 36,000 $ 37,500

Kent County
Bowers Volunteer Fire Co. Bowers $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Camden‑Wyoming Fire Co. Camden $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Carlisle Fire Co. Milford $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Cheswold Volunteer Fire Co. Cheswold $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Citizens' Hose Co. No. 1 Smyrna $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Page 10 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Clayton Fire Co. Clayton $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Dover Fire Dept. Dover $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Farmington Volunteer Fire Co. Farmington $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Felton Community Fire Co. Felton $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Frederica Volunteer Fire Co. Frederica $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Harrington Fire Co. Harrington $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Hartly Volunteer Fire Co. Hartly $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Houston Volunteer Fire Co. Houston $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Leipsic Volunteer Fire Co. Leipsic $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Little Creek Volunteer Fire Co. Little Creek $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Magnolia Volunteer Fire Co. Magnolia $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Marydel Volunteer Fire Co. Marydel $ 36,000 $ 37,500
South Bowers Fire Co. South Bowers $ 36,000 $ 37,500

Sussex County
Bethany Beach Volunteer Fire Co. Bethany Beach $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Blades Volunteer Fire Co. Blades $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Bridgeville Volunteer Fire Co. Bridgeville $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Dagsboro Volunteer Fire Co. Dagsboro $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Delmar Fire Dept. Delmar $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Ellendale Volunteer Fire Co. Ellendale $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Frankford Volunteer Fire Co. Frankford $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Georgetown Fire Co. Georgetown $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Greenwood Volunteer Fire Co. Greenwood $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Gumboro Volunteer Fire Co. Gumboro $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Indian River Volunteer Fire Co. Indian River $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Laurel Fire Dept. Laurel $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Lewes Fire Dept. Lewes $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Memorial Volunteer Fire Co. Slaughter Beach $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Millsboro Fire Co. Millsboro $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Millville Volunteer Fire Co. Millville $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Milton Fire Dept. Milton $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Rehoboth Beach Volunteer Fire Co. Rehoboth Beach $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Roxana Volunteer Fire Co. Roxana $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Seaford Volunteer Fire Dept. Seaford $ 36,000 $ 37,500
Selbyville Volunteer Fire Co. Selbyville $ 36,000 $ 37,500

TOTAL $ 2,160,000 $ 2,250,000

(b) There is appropriated to the listed fire companies the following sums to be used for the maintenance and operation of
ambulances in the public service:

New Castle County
Aetna Hose, Hook and Ladder Co. – 5 ambulances Newark $ 75,000 $ 100,000
Belvedere Volunteer Fire Co. – 1 ambulance Belvedere $ 15,000 $ 20,000
Brandywine Hundred Fire Co. No. 1 – 3 ambulances Bellefonte $ 45,000 $ 60,000
Christiana Fire Co. – 7 ambulances 9 ambulances Christiana $ 105,000 $ 180,000
Claymont Fire Co. – 3 ambulances Claymont $ 45,000 $ 60,000
Cranston Heights Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Cranston Heights $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Delaware City Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Delaware City $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Elsmere Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Elsmere $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Five Points Fire Co. No. 1 – 2 ambulances Richardson Park $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Good Will Fire Co. No. 1 – 2 ambulances New Castle $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Hockessin Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Hockessin $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Holloway Terrace Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Holloway Terrace $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Mill Creek Fire Co. – 6 ambulances Marshallton $ 90,000 $ 120,000
Minquadale Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Minquadale $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Minquas Fire Co. No. 1 – 1 ambulance 2 ambulances Newport $ 15,000 $ 40,000
Page 11 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Odessa Fire Co. – 3 ambulances Odessa $ 45,000 $ 60,000
Port Penn Volunteer Fire Co. – 1 ambulance Port Penn $ 15,000 $ 20,000
Talleyville Fire Co. – 3 ambulances Talleyville $ 45,000 $ 60,000
Townsend Fire Co. – 3 ambulances Townsend $ 45,000 $ 60,000
Volunteer Hose Co. – 4 ambulances Middletown $ 60,000 $ 80,000
Wilmington Manor Volunteer Fire Co. – 3 ambulances Wilmington Manor $ 45,000 $ 60,000

Kent County
Bowers Volunteer Fire Co. – 1 ambulance Bowers $ 15,000 $ 20,000
Camden‑Wyoming Fire Co. – 3 ambulances Camden $ 45,000 $ 60,000
Carlisle Fire Co. – 2 ambulances 3 ambulances Milford $ 30,000 $ 60,000
Cheswold Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Cheswold $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Felton Community Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Felton $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Frederica Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Frederica $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Harrington Fire Co. – 4 ambulances Harrington $ 60,000 $ 80,000
Hartly Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Hartly $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Houston Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Houston $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Leipsic Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Leipsic $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Magnolia Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Magnolia $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Marydel Volunteer Fire Co. – 3 ambulances Marydel $ 45,000 $ 60,000

Sussex County
Bethany Beach Volunteer Fire Co. – 3 ambulances Bethany Beach $ 45,000 $ 60,000
Blades Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Blades $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Bridgeville Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Bridgeville $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Dagsboro Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Dagsboro $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Delmar Fire Dept. – 3 ambulances Delmar $ 45,000 $ 60,000
Ellendale Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Ellendale $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Frankford Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Frankford $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Greenwood Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Greenwood $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Gumboro Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances 3 ambulances Gumboro $ 30,000 $ 60,000
Laurel Fire Dept. – 2 ambulances Laurel $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Lewes Fire Dept. – 6 ambulances Lewes $ 90,000 $ 120,000
Memorial Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Slaughter Beach $ 30,000 $ 40,000
Millsboro Fire Co. – 4 ambulances 5 ambulances Millsboro $ 60,000 $ 100,000
Millville Volunteer Fire Co. – 4 ambulances Millville $ 60,000 $ 80,000
Milton Fire Dept. – 3 ambulances Milton $ 45,000 $ 60,000
Rehoboth Beach Volunteer Fire Co. – 4 ambulances Rehoboth Beach $ 60,000 $ 80,000
Roxana Volunteer Fire Co. – 3 ambulances 4 ambulances Roxana $ 45,000 $ 80,000
Seaford Volunteer Fire Co. – 3 ambulances Seaford $ 45,000 $ 60,000
Selbyville Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 ambulances Selbyville $ 30,000 $ 40,000

TOTAL $ 2,085,000 $ 2,920,000

(c) There is appropriated to the listed fire companies the following sums to be used for the maintenance and operation of
rescue trucks in the public service:

New Castle County
Aetna Hose, Hook and Ladder Co. Newark $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Belvedere Volunteer Fire Co. Wilmington $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Brandywine Hundred Fire Co. No. 1 Bellefonte $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Christiana Fire Co. Christiana $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Claymont Fire Co. Claymont $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Cranston Heights Fire Co. Cranston Heights $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Delaware City Fire Co. Delaware City $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Elsmere Fire Co. Elsmere $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Five Points Fire Co. No. 1 Richardson Park $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Good Will Fire Co. No. 1 New Castle $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Page 12 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Hockessin Fire Co. Hockessin $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Holloway Terrace Fire Co. Holloway Terrace $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Mill Creek Fire Co. Marshallton $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Minquadale Fire Co. Minquadale $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Minquas Fire Co. No. 1 Newport $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Odessa Fire Co. Odessa $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Port Penn Volunteer Fire Co. Port Penn $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Talleyville Fire Co. Talleyville $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Townsend Fire Co. Townsend $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Volunteer Hose Co. Middletown $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Wilmington Manor Volunteer Fire Co. Wilmington Manor $ 6,050 $ 8,000

Kent County
Bowers Volunteer Fire Co. Bowers $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Camden‑Wyoming Fire Co. Camden $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Carlisle Fire Co. Milford $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Cheswold Volunteer Fire Co. Cheswold $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Citizens' Hose Co. No. 1 Smyrna $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Clayton Fire Co. Clayton $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Dover Fire Dept. Dover $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Farmington Volunteer Fire Co. Farmington $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Felton Community Fire Co. Felton $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Frederica Volunteer Fire Co. Frederica $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Harrington Fire Co. Harrington $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Hartly Volunteer Fire Co. Hartly $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Houston Volunteer Fire Co. Houston $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Leipsic Volunteer Fire Co. Leipsic $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Little Creek Volunteer Fire Co. Little Creek $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Magnolia Volunteer Fire Co. Magnolia $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Marydel Volunteer Fire Co. Marydel $ 6,050 $ 8,000
South Bowers Fire Co. South Bowers $ 6,050 $ 8,000

Sussex County
Bethany Beach Volunteer Fire Co. Bethany Beach $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Blades Volunteer Fire Co. Blades $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Bridgeville Volunteer Fire Co. Bridgeville $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Dagsboro Volunteer Fire Co. Dagsboro $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Delmar Fire Dept. Delmar $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Ellendale Volunteer Fire Co. Ellendale $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Frankford Volunteer Fire Co. Frankford $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Georgetown Fire Co. Georgetown $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Greenwood Volunteer Fire Co. Greenwood $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Gumboro Volunteer Fire Co. Gumboro $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Indian River Volunteer Fire Co. Indian River $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Laurel Fire Dept. Laurel $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Lewes Fire Dept. Lewes $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Memorial Volunteer Fire Co. Slaughter Beach $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Millsboro Fire Co. Millsboro $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Millville Volunteer Fire Co. Millville $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Milton Fire Dept. Milton $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Rehoboth Beach Volunteer Fire Co. Rehoboth Beach $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Roxana Volunteer Fire Co. Roxana $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Seaford Volunteer Fire Dept. Seaford $ 6,050 $ 8,000
Selbyville Fire Co. Selbyville $ 6,050 $ 8,000

TOTAL $ 363,000 $ 480,000
Page 13 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

(d) There is appropriated to the listed fire companies the following sums to be used for the maintenance of aerial or
platform trucks and for the training of personnel in the techniques of extinguishing high-rise fires throughout Delaware:

New Castle County
Aetna Hose, Hook and Ladder Co. Newark $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Brandywine Hundred Fire Co. No. 1 Bellefonte $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Christiana Fire Co. Christiana $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Claymont Fire Co. Claymont $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Delaware City Fire Co. Delaware City $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Elsmere Fire Co. Elsmere $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Five Points Fire Co. No. 1 Richardson Park $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Good Will Fire Co. No. 1 New Castle $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Hockessin Fire Co. Hockessin $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Mill Creek Fire Co. Marshallton $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Odessa Fire Co. Odessa $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Talleyville Fire Co. Talleyville $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Volunteer Hose Co. Middletown $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Wilmington Manor Volunteer Fire Co. Wilmington Manor $ 15,000 $ 16,000

Kent County
Bowers Volunteer Fire Co. Bowers $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Camden-Wyoming Fire Co. Camden $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Carlisle Fire Co. Milford $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Cheswold Volunteer Fire Co. Cheswold $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Citizens' Hose Co. No. 1 Smyrna $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Clayton Fire Co. Clayton $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Dover Fire Dept. Dover $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Frederica Volunteer Fire Co. Frederica $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Harrington Fire Co. Harrington $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Little Creek Volunteer Fire Co. Little Creek $ 15,000 $ 16,000

Sussex County
Bethany Beach Volunteer Fire Co. Bethany Beach $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Dagsboro Volunteer Fire Co. Dagsboro $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Delmar Fire Dept. Delmar $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Ellendale Volunteer Fire Co. Ellendale $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Georgetown Fire Co. Georgetown $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Greenwood Volunteer Fire Co. Greenwood $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Indian River Volunteer Fire Co. Indian River $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Laurel Fire Dept. Laurel $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Lewes Fire Dept. Lewes $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Memorial Volunteer Fire Co. Slaughter Beach $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Millsboro Fire Co. Millsboro $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Milton Fire Dept. Milton $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Rehoboth Beach Volunteer Fire Co. Rehoboth Beach $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Roxana Volunteer Fire Co. Roxanna $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Seaford Volunteer Fire Co. Seaford $ 15,000 $ 16,000
Selbyville Volunteer Fire Co. Selbyville $ 15,000 $ 16,000

TOTAL $ 600,000 $ 640,000

(e) There is appropriated to the listed fire companies the following sums to be used for the maintenance and operation of
rescue boats in the public service:

New Castle County
Delaware City Fire Co. – 2 rescue boats Delaware City $ 7,444 $ 8,000
Good Will Fire Co. No. 1 – 2 rescue boats New Castle $ 7,444 $ 8,000
Holloway Terrace Fire Co. – 2 rescue boats Holloway Terrace $ 7,444 $ 8,000
Page 14 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Minquas Fire Co. No. 1 – 2 rescue boats Newport $ 7,444 $ 8,000
Odessa Fire Co. – 1 rescue boat Odessa $ 3,722 $ 4,000
Port Penn Volunteer Fire Co. – 3 rescue boats Port Penn $ 11,166 $ 12,000
Townsend Fire Co. – 2 rescue boats Townsend $ 7,444 $ 8,000
Volunteer Hose Co. – 1 rescue boat Middletown $ 3,722 $ 4,000

Kent County
Bowers Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 rescue boats Bowers Beach $ 7,444 $ 8,000
Carlisle Fire Co. – 1 rescue boat Milford $ 3,722 $ 4,000
Cheswold Volunteer Fire Co. – 1 rescue boat Cheswold $ 3,722 $ 4,000
Citizens' Hose Co. No. 1 – 1 rescue boat 2 rescue boats Smyrna $ 3,722 $ 8,000
Dover Fire Dept. – 1 rescue boat Dover $ 3,722 $ 4,000
Frederica Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 rescue boats Frederica $ 7,444 $ 8,000
Leipsic Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 rescue boats Leipsic $ 7,444 $ 8,000
Little Creek Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 rescue boats Little Creek $ 7,444 $ 8,000
Magnolia Volunteer Fire Co. – 1 rescue boat 2 rescue boats Magnolia $ 3,722 $ 8,000
Marydel Volunteer Fire Co. – 1 rescue boat Marydel $ 3,722 $ 4,000
South Bowers Fire Co. – 3 rescue boats South Bowers $ 11,166 $ 12,000

Sussex County
Bethany Beach Volunteer Fire Co. – 1 rescue boat Bethany Beach $ 3,722 $ 4,000
Blades Volunteer Fire Co. – 1 rescue boat Blades $ 3,722 $ 4,000
Dagsboro Volunteer Fire Co. – 1 rescue boat Dagsboro $ 3,722 $ 4,000
Delmar Fire Dept. - 1 rescue boat Delmar $ 4,000
Indian River Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 rescue boats Indian River $ 7,444 $ 8,000
Laurel Fire Dept. – 1 rescue boat Laurel $ 3,722 $ 4,000
Lewes Fire Dept. – 3 rescue boats Lewes $ 11,166 $ 12,000
Memorial Volunteer Fire Co. – 1 rescue boat 2 rescue boats Slaughter Beach $ 3,722 $ 8,000
Millsboro Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 rescue boats Millsboro $ 7,444 $ 8,000
Millville Volunteer Fire Co. – 1 rescue boat Millville $ 3,722 $ 4,000
Milton Fire Dept. – 2 rescue boats Milton $ 7,444 $ 8,000
Rehoboth Volunteer Fire Co. – 2 rescue boats Rehoboth $ 7,444 $ 8,000
Roxana Volunteer Fire Co. – 1 rescue boat Roxana $ 3,722 $ 4,000
Seaford Volunteer Fire Co. – 1 rescue boat Seaford $ 3,722 $ 4,000
Selbyville Volunteer Fire Co. – 1 rescue boat Selbyville $ 3,722 $ 4,000

TOTAL $ 193,544 $ 224,000

(f) There is appropriated to the Mayor and Council of Wilmington the following sums to be used for:

(i) the prevention and extinguishment of fires throughout the City of
Wilmington and for the maintenance of the apparatus and equipment
of the fire companies organized and equipped in the City. $ 247,356 $ 257,663

(ii) the maintenance of aerial or platform trucks and for the training of
personnel in the techniques of extinguishing high-rise fires
throughout the City of Wilmington. $ 25,000 $ 26,000

(iii) the maintenance and operation of 2 rescue boats in the public
service. $ 7,444 $ 8,000

TOTAL $ 279,800 $ 291,663
Page 15 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

(g) There is appropriated to the listed fire companies the following sums to help level up the insurance premium tax
revenues to be used for the maintenance of apparatus and equipment:

Kent County
Bowers Volunteer Fire Co. Bowers $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Camden‑Wyoming Fire Co. Camden $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Carlisle Fire Co. Milford $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Cheswold Volunteer Fire Co. Cheswold $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Citizens' Hose Co. No. 1 Smyrna $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Clayton Fire Co. Clayton $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Dover Fire Dept. Dover $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Farmington Volunteer Fire Co. Farmington $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Felton Community Fire Co. Felton $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Frederica Volunteer Fire Co. Frederica $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Harrington Fire Co. Harrington $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Hartly Volunteer Fire Co. Hartly $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Houston Volunteer Fire Co. Houston $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Leipsic Volunteer Fire Co. Leipsic $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Little Creek Volunteer Fire Co. Little Creek $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Magnolia Volunteer Fire Co. Magnolia $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Marydel Volunteer Fire Co. Marydel $ 39,951 $ 42,000
South Bowers Fire Co. South Bowers $ 39,951 $ 42,000

Sussex County
Bethany Beach Volunteer Fire Co. Bethany Beach $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Blades Volunteer Fire Co. Blades $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Bridgeville Volunteer Fire Co. Bridgeville $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Dagsboro Volunteer Fire Co. Dagsboro $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Delmar Fire Dept. Delmar $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Ellendale Volunteer Fire Co. Ellendale $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Frankford Volunteer Fire Co. Frankford $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Georgetown Fire Co. Georgetown $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Greenwood Volunteer Fire Co. Greenwood $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Gumboro Volunteer Fire Co. Gumboro $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Indian River Volunteer Fire Co. Indian River $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Laurel Fire Dept. Laurel $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Lewes Fire Dept. Lewes $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Memorial Volunteer Fire Co. Slaughter Beach $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Millsboro Fire Co. Millsboro $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Millville Volunteer Fire Co. Millville $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Milton Fire Dept. Milton $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Rehoboth Beach Volunteer Fire Co. Rehoboth Beach $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Roxana Volunteer Fire Co. Roxana $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Seaford Volunteer Fire Dept. Seaford $ 39,951 $ 42,000
Selbyville Volunteer Fire Co. Selbyville $ 39,951 $ 42,000

TOTAL $ 1,558,089 $ 1,638,000

(h) (1) There is appropriated to the listed fire companies the following sums to provide Insurance Rebate Equalization for
operations of volunteer fire companies:

Kent County
Bowers Volunteer Fire Co. Bowers $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Camden‑Wyoming Fire Co. Camden $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Carlisle Fire Co. Milford $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Cheswold Volunteer Fire Co. Cheswold $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Citizens' Hose Co. No. 1 Smyrna $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Clayton Fire Co. Clayton $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Page 16 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Dover Fire Dept. Dover $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Farmington Volunteer Fire Co. Farmington $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Felton Community Fire Co. Felton $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Frederica Volunteer Fire Co. Frederica $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Harrington Fire Co. Harrington $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Hartly Volunteer Fire Co. Hartly $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Houston Volunteer Fire Co. Houston $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Leipsic Volunteer Fire Co. Leipsic $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Little Creek Volunteer Fire Co. Little Creek $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Magnolia Volunteer Fire Co. Magnolia $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Marydel Volunteer Fire Co. Marydel $ 95,000 $ 101,650
South Bowers Fire Co. South Bowers $ 95,000 $ 101,650

Sussex County
Bethany Beach Volunteer Fire Co. Bethany Beach $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Blades Volunteer Fire Co. Blades $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Bridgeville Volunteer Fire Co. Bridgeville $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Dagsboro Volunteer Fire Co. Dagsboro $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Delmar Fire Dept. Delmar $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Ellendale Volunteer Fire Co. Ellendale $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Frankford Volunteer Fire Co. Frankford $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Georgetown Fire Co. Georgetown $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Greenwood Volunteer Fire Co. Greenwood $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Gumboro Volunteer Fire Co. Gumboro $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Indian River Volunteer Fire Co. Indian River $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Laurel Fire Dept. Laurel $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Lewes Fire Dept. Lewes $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Memorial Volunteer Fire Co. Slaughter Beach $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Millsboro Fire Co. Millsboro $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Millville Volunteer Fire Co. Millville $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Milton Fire Dept. Milton $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Rehoboth Beach Volunteer Fire Co. Rehoboth Beach $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Roxana Volunteer Fire Co. Roxana $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Seaford Volunteer Fire Dept. Seaford $ 95,000 $ 101,650
Selbyville Volunteer Fire Co. Selbyville $ 95,000 $ 101,650

TOTAL $ 3,705,000 $ 3,964,350

(2) For the current fiscal year, a calculation was made to determine the increase that the New Castle County Volunteer
Fire Companies received for the insurance premium tax by calculating the difference between the two calendar years that
immediately precede the current calendar year. The Joint Finance Committee intends to review this allocation annually
for determination of the amount to be added to the base allocation to each Volunteer Fire Company in Kent and Sussex
Counties. At no time shall this amount be less than the base amount of $22,401 that was included in the Fiscal Year 1999
Grant-in-Aid Appropriation Bill.

(i) There is hereby appropriated to the listed fire companies the following sums for operation of substations:

New Castle County
Aetna Hose, Hook and Ladder Co. – 2 substations Newark $ 50,000 $ 60,000
Christiana Fire Co. – 2 substations Christiana $ 50,000 $ 60,000
Claymont Fire Co. Claymont $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Mill Creek Fire Co. Marshallton $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Odessa Fire Co. Odessa $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Volunteer Hose Co. Middletown $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Wilmington Manor Volunteer Fire Co. Wilmington Manor $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Page 17 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Kent County
Dover Fire Dept. Dover $ 25,000 $ 30,000

Sussex County
Bethany Beach Volunteer Fire Co. Bethany Beach $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Ellendale Volunteer Fire Co. Ellendale $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Indian River Volunteer Fire Co. Indian River $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Laurel Fire Dept. Laurel $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Lewes and Rehoboth Station 3 Rehoboth Beach $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Lewes Fire Dept. Lewes $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Memorial Volunteer Fire Co. Slaughter Beach $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Millsboro Fire Co. Millsboro $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Millville Volunteer Fire Co. Millville $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Rehoboth Fire Volunteer Fire Co. Rehoboth Beach $ 25,000 $ 30,000
Roxana Volunteer Fire Co. Roxana $ 25,000 $ 30,000

TOTAL $ 525,000 $ 630,000

(j) There is appropriated to the listed organizations the following sums to be used for the operation and maintenance of
ambulances in the public service:

American Legion, Kent Post 14 – 4 ambulances Smyrna $ 60,000 $ 80,000
American Legion, Sussex Post 8 – 3 ambulances Georgetown $ 45,000 $ 60,000
Mid‑Sussex Rescue Squad – 4 ambulances Millsboro $ 60,000 $ 80,000

TOTAL $ 165,000 $ 220,000

TOTAL - Section 3 - Fire Companies and Public Service Ambulance Companies $ 11,634,433 $ 13,258,013

Section 4. (a) Funds are hereby appropriated to the following Grant‑in‑Aid recipients in the amounts listed and shall be
used to furnish services through a duly selected service officer to Delaware Veterans of the Armed Forces of the United States,
their widows and orphans, by providing contact services in Sussex, Kent and New Castle Counties:

American Legion, Callaway Kemp Raughley Tee Post 7 $ 12,750
American Legion, David C. Harrison Post 14 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
American Legion, Department of Delaware $ 65,000 $ 67,500
American Legion, Milford Post 3 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
American Legion, Oak Orchard-Riverdale Post 28 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
American Legion, Walter L. Fox Post 2 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
American Legion, William T. Spooner Post 17 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
Delaware American Legion Foundation $ 12,500 $ 12,750
Delaware Veterans, Post 2 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
Disabled American Veterans $ 57,000 $ 59,000
Disabled American Veterans, Chapter 1 $ 7,500
Disabled American Veterans, Chapter 7 $ 7,500
National Association for Black Veterans, Chapter 94 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
Paralyzed Veterans of America Colonial Chapter , Colonial Chapter $ 45,000 $ 47,500
Peoples Community Center - Center for Transitioning Veterans $ 12,750
People's Place II $ 22,500 $ 30,000
Veterans of Foreign Wars, Department of Delaware $ 48,000 $ 50,000
Vietnam Veterans of America, Chapter 83 $ 61,970 $ 62,000
Vietnam Veterans of America, Chapter 850 $ 45,000 $ 47,000

(b) Funds are hereby appropriated to the following Grant‑in‑Aid recipients in the amounts listed for operations expenses:

American Legion, Callaway Kemp Raughley Tee Post 7 $ 12,750
American Legion, Canal Post 25 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
American Legion, David C. Harrison Post 14 $ 15,000
Page 18 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

American Legion, Department of Delaware $ 18,000 $ 20,000
American Legion, Milford Post 3 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
American Legion, Oak Orchard-Riverdale Post 28 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
American Legion, Walter L. Fox Post 2 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
American Legion, William T. Spooner Post 17 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
Delaware American Legion Foundation $ 9,000 $ 12,750
Delaware Veterans, Post 2 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
Disabled American Veterans, Chapter 1 $ 2,500
Disabled American Veterans, Chapter 7 $ 2,500
Disabled American Veterans, Department of Delaware $ 12,500 $ 12,750
Home of the Brave Foundation $ 7,500
National Association for Black Veterans, Chapter 94 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
Paralyzed Veterans of America Colonial Chapter , Colonial Chapter $ 15,000
Peoples Community Center - Center for Transitioning Veterans $ 12,000
People's Place II $ 22,500 $ 35,000
Veterans of Foreign Wars, Department of Delaware $ 12,500 $ 12,750
Veterans of Foreign Wars, Post 8801 $ 5,000
Vietnam Veterans of America, Chapter 1105 $ 12,750
Vietnam Veterans of America, Chapter 83 $ 12,500 $ 12,750
Vietnam Veterans of America, Chapter 850 $ 12,500 $ 15,000

(c) Expenses for Memorial Day programs incurred by local Posts in Sussex, Kent and New Castle Counties shall be
reimbursed out of operation expenses appropriated in subsection (b) of this Section on vouchers properly submitted to
and approved by their representative veterans' organizations.

(d) There is appropriated to the American Legion, Department of Delaware the following sums to be used for:

(i) the bearing of expenses incident to the holding of Boys' State. $ 12,250 $ 12,750

(ii) the bearing of expenses incident to the holding of Trooper Youth
Week in conjunction with the Delaware State Police. $ 12,250 $ 12,750

(e) There is appropriated to the American Legion Auxiliary, Department of Delaware
the following sum to be used for the bearing of expenses incident to the holding of
Girls' State. $ 12,250 $ 12,750

TOTAL ‑ Section 4 - Veterans Organizations $ 698,220 $ 839,000
Page 19 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/25/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Section 5. To be considered for a Grant-in-Aid appropriation under Section 1 or Section 2 of this Act, an
agency must meet the following criteria:
(a) Be an incorporated non-profit (or under the umbrella of a parent organization which is also an incorporated
non-profit) and operating for two years before applying for Grant-in-Aid.
(b) Have bylaws that clearly state the purpose of the agency and include a definition of the duties of the Board
of Directors.
(c) Have an active, community-represented, volunteer Board of Directors that sets policies, goals, and
objectives and maintains minutes of regularly scheduled meetings and any special meetings.
(d) Have programs that are unduplicated by other state-supported agencies and satisfy unmet human needs of
the community; have personnel policies including job descriptions and classifications.
(e) Have competent executives, competent staffing, and reasonable facilities.
(f) Practice non-discrimination.
(g) Have accounting (budget) procedures and documents described in Section 9 of this Act.
(h) Use funds in accordance with the application.
(i) Demonstrate community support.
(j) Request funds only for a program which does not receive full funding from other sources of revenue.
(k) Must not request funds through a fiscal agent.
(l) Submit an annual electronic application by the deadline noticed in the Controller General’s Office Grants
Management System and on the Grant-in-Aid website.
Section 6. No funds appropriated in this Act shall be expended for:
(a) Providing child daycare.
(b) The purchase of capital equipment.
(c) The relocation, rehabilitation, renovation, or purchase of buildings.
(d) The payment of any part of an elected official’s salary or benefits.
(e) A political campaign or for partisan political purposes.
(f) The hiring of lobbyists or other lobbying services.
(g) Activities, programs, or services that benefit individuals who do not reside in Delaware.
Section 7. The Controller General may, from time to time, contract for or conduct performance and financial
audits of any non-state agency for which funds are appropriated in this Act. During the fiscal year, the Joint Finance
Committee Co-Chairs and the Office of the Controller General shall conduct random, in-depth assessments of agencies
Page 20 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/26/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

listed in this Act. Said assessments shall include, but not be limited to, a review of the agency’s performance measures,
program evaluation metrics, site visits, and meetings with agency Executive Directors and Board of Directors.
Section 8. Section 6505(d) of Title 29 of the Delaware Code provides that monies appropriated for Grant-in-
Aid in each fiscal year shall be paid in quarterly installments. For each fiscal year, payments shall be paid in four equal
installments, one each in July, October, January, and April. Upon notification by a Co-Chair of the Joint Finance
Committee or the Office of the Controller General, the State Treasurer shall be directed to withhold such installment
payment(s). An installment payment may also be delayed or withheld if the Grant-in-Aid recipient:
(a) Has not submitted a quarterly statement of expenditures if required to do so.
(b) Expended funds from Grant-in-Aid for purposes not intended by the General Assembly.
(c) Expended funds for uses listed in Section 6.
(d) Is ceasing some or all its activities, programs, or service(s) for which it has applied or is no longer in operation.
Any remaining funding may be reallocated upon approval from the Controller General as determined by the Co-Chairs of
the Joint Finance Committee.
(e) In the case of a senior center closing during the fiscal year, any remaining quarterly payments will be retained
in the Office of the Controller General. Disbursements from this account shall be made in consultation with the University
of Delaware and with the approval of the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance Committee.
Section 9. (a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that each Grant-in-Aid recipient shall submit one of the
following with its application for a grant award in each fiscal year:
(1) The most recent copy of the agency’s audit completed by either a Certified Public Accountant or a Public
Accountant. The audit must have been issued within the past three years.
(2) The most recent copy of the agency’s review or compilation of financial statements completed by either a
Certified Public Accountant or a Public Accountant. The review or compilation must have been issued
within the past three years.
(3) If the agency is not able to provide an audit or a review or compilation of financial statements, the agency
must submit a statement of the circumstances surrounding the reason in its electronic application. It
should also include any supporting financial documentation that may assist the Joint Finance Committee
in its application review, including but not limited to prepared profit and loss statements, relevant budget
materials, IRS Form 990s, or bank statements.
(4) The lack of an audit, review or compilation of financial statements, or supporting financial documentation
may impact the ultimate funding decision of the Joint Finance Committee.
Page 21 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/26/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

(b) Fire companies listed in this Act shall submit financial information on the form approved by the State
Treasurer, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and the Controller General. Financial forms will be
submitted to the State Fire School, and they will be responsible for forwarding copies of the forms to the Office of the
Controller General. The listed fire companies in Section 3 of this Act are exempt from the provisions of subsection (a) of
this section and are not required to submit an annual electronic application for funding for Grant-in-Aid.
(c) Non-compliance by a Grant-in-Aid recipient with the provisions of this Section shall automatically disqualify
the applicant for consideration of a Grant-in-Aid award in the next fiscal year.
Section 10. It is the intent of the Joint Finance Committee to review all Grant-in-Aid applications and give
consideration to the diversity of an agency’s revenues, including the percentage of revenues that are from other State
funding sources, agency grants, or contracts. The Joint Finance Committee will also consider the percentage of an agency’s
budget allocated to salaries and benefits.
Section 11. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to the County Seat Package, of that amount, $100,000 is
appropriated to the City of Dover, $14,000 is appropriated to the City of Georgetown, and the balance will be appropriated
by formula. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to the Department of Finance, Office of the Secretary (25-01-
01), for the County Seat Package. Of that amount, $100,000 is appropriated to the City of Dover, $14,000 is appropriated to
the Town of Georgetown, and the balance will be appropriated by formula. Of the amount appropriated to the City of
Wilmington, up to $300,000 shall be used for public safety.
Section 12. (a) Section 1 of this Act makes provides an appropriation to the Department of Health and Social
Services, Public Health, Emergency Medical Services (35-05-30), for Paramedic Program Operations for the state
component of the operational costs associated with each county’s paramedic service for Advanced Life Support. It is the
intent of the General Assembly that for each fiscal year, the state appropriation for county paramedic program operations
pursuant to 16 Del. C. Ch. 98 will be based on each county’s adopted budget for the fiscal year immediately prior to the
fiscal year in which the paramedic program is to be funded. Such payments shall be made pursuant to Section 8 of this Act.
Further, it is the intent of the General Assembly to review 16 Del. C. Ch. 98 to determine the most appropriate county and
state cost share for the continued support of this program.
(b) Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $3,000,000 to the Department of Health and Social Services,
Public Health, Emergency Medical Services (35-05-30), for Paramedic Program Operations Block Grant. These funds shall
be allocated equally among counties that operate an approved paramedic program and shall be used for operational costs.
The Department is authorized to take the necessary steps to make a total payment of the Paramedic Program Operations
Block Grant at the beginning of the first quarter of each fiscal year. To any extent necessary, the Office of Emergency
Page 22 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/26/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Medical Services shall report to the Office of the Controller General and the Office of Management and Budget by May 1,
2026, if the Office has any suggested changes that should be considered in 16 Del. C. c. 98 or epilogue in the Grants-in-Aid
Act as it relates to facilitating the disbursement of the Paramedic Program Operations Block Grant or the calculation and
disbursement of the state component of the Paramedic Program Operations to allow for optimal use of the funding among
the counties that operate an approved paramedic program.
(b) (c) Emergency Medical Services shall have an audit performed by the State Auditor annually to ensure that
reimbursement to the counties for the state share of costs was for approved Advanced Life Support Services. Adjustments
shall be made to the final quarterly reimbursement based on the audit results.
Section 13. The sums appropriated to the various Senior Centers in Section 1 of this Act shall be made available
to the Department of Health and Social Services, Division of Services for Aging and Adults with Physical Disabilities,
Administration/Community Services (35-14-01), to meet the State’s matching requirement for federal funds appropriated
under the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended. Those senior centers receiving funds under the Older Americans Act
of 1965, as amended, shall present to the Division of Services for Aging and Adults with Physical Disabilities a proposal
for the expenditure of state funds. The proposal submitted to the Division of Services for Aging and Adults with Physical
Disabilities shall be prepared in accordance with the guidelines established for the administration of programs under the
Older Americans Act. To be considered for funding, a senior center must meet the criteria established in Section 5. Funding
will be determined by the Joint Finance Committee based upon its evaluation and with advice from the University of
Delaware Institute for Public Administration (IPA). Any professional services contract the IPA provides to the Office of the
Controller General shall not contain an amount used to fund overhead or student tuition expenses.
Section 14. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Department of Health and Social Services, Division
of Public Health, continue funding the Alliance for Adolescent Pregnancy Prevention at the Fiscal Year 2006 contract
levels.
Section 15. (a) The funds appropriated in Section 1 for the Department of Safety and Homeland Security (DSHS),
Office of the Secretary, Administration (45-01-01), State Aid to Local Law Enforcement (SALLE), and Emergency Illegal
Drug Enforcement (EIDE), shall be allocated according to an application process administered by the DSHS with the award
amounts determined by the SALLE Committee. Expenditures from these funds must be approved by the Director of the
Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
(b) Local law enforcement agencies may combine their allocations, upon approval of the SALLE Committee, to
support a pool arrangement to fund a contiguous area served by more than one local law enforcement agency.
Page 23 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/26/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

(c) Each local law enforcement agency contracting for an allocation shall, not later than April 1 of the current
fiscal year, report in detail the plan under which such funds are being expended, and any other information requested by the
SALLE Committee. The DSHS shall submit an annual report to the members of the General Assembly, the Director of the
Office of Management and Budget, and the Controller General on or before May 1 of the current fiscal year, detailing the
agencies that were awarded grants from these funds, the amount of the grants, and the purpose of the grants.
Section 16. Appropriations made in Section 1 of this Act to Emergency Medical Services, SALLE, and EIDE
shall not be subject to the provisions in Sections 5, 6, 8, and 9. Funds appropriated to SALLE and EIDE shall not be subject
to reversion at the end of the fiscal year if unexpended or unencumbered, and shall be continued for a period of up to three
years.
Section 17. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to the Department of Safety and Homeland Security,
Office of the Secretary, Administration (45-01-01), for the Higher Education Public Safety Fund for municipalities with
local law enforcement agencies and fire departments serving higher education institutions that have on-campus residence
halls. Of that amount, $2,000,000 is appropriated to the City of Newark, and $1,650,000 is appropriated to the City of
Dover. Of the amount appropriated to the City of Dover, $500,000 shall be provided to the City of Dover Police
Department. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $1,650,000 to the Department of Safety and Homeland
Security, Office of the Secretary, Administration (45-01-01), for the Higher Education Public Safety Fund. This amount
shall be appropriated to the Mayor and the Council of Dover and shall be used to offset expenditures related to providing
police and fire services at the campuses of Delaware State University, Delaware Technical Community College, and the
University of Delaware in Dover.
Section 18. (a) The State Treasurer is authorized to take the necessary steps to make a total payment of the
appropriation in Section 2 of this Act at the beginning of the first quarter of the fiscal year for the agencies as follows:
ARC of Delaware
August Quarterly Festival Committee
Camp Barnes
City of Delaware City – Delaware City Day Committee
City of New Castle – Separation Day
Delaware Academy of Science
Delaware Association for Blind Athletes
Delaware Juneteenth Association
New Castle Historical Society
Page 24 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/26/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

(b) The State Treasurer is authorized to take the necessary steps to make a total payment of the appropriation to
any Grant-in-Aid recipient receiving an amount of $6,000 or less listed in Sections 2 or 4 of this Act at the beginning of the
first quarter of each fiscal year.
(c) The State Treasurer is authorized to take the necessary steps to make a total payment of the appropriation to the
fire companies listed in Section 3 of this Act at the beginning of the first quarter of each fiscal year.
(d) The State Treasurer is authorized to take the necessary steps to make a total payment of the appropriation to
organizations funded on a one-time basis in Section 2 of this Act at the beginning of the first quarter of each fiscal year.
(e) For Fiscal Year 2025, the State Treasurer is authorized to make a one-time payment for specific organizations
listed in Section 2 that the Office of the Controller General identifies by notice to the State Treasurer to have been impacted
by the movement of funding from the Annual Appropriations Act to this Act. The one-time payment will only be for the
amount reallocated from the Annual Appropriations Act, and any additional funding above the reallocation amount
awarded through this Act will be subject to the provisions of 29 Del. C. § 6505(d). For Fiscal Year 2026 and beyond, it is
the intent of the Joint Finance Committee that these impacted organizations submit an electronic application in the
Controller General’s Office Grants Management System subject to the provisions of Sections 5 and 6 of this Act and that
any allocations provided will be awarded consistent with Section 8 and 29 Del. C. § 6505(d).
Section 19. Section 2 of this Act appropriates $200,000 for Collaborative for Innovation in Delaware Corporate
Governance to Judicial, Administrative Office of the Courts – Court Services, Office of the State Court Administrator (02-
17-01). The expenditure of these funds shall be used for the purposes of research conducted by the University of Delaware
Institute for Public Administration related to the Delaware corporate franchise. The provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall not
apply.
Section 20. Section 2 of this Act appropriates $5,000,000 $2,000,000 for Community Health Contingency to the
Department of Health and Social Services, Office of the Secretary (35-01-10). The expenditure of these funds shall be used
for the operation and continuation of health care services offered by various statewide Community Health Centers. The
distribution and expenditure of these funds shall be reported by the recipient Community Health Centers to the Department
of Health and Social Services, to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and the Controller General by
February 1, 2025. 2026.
Section 21. Section 2 of this Act appropriates $5,000,000 for Health Care Contingency to the Department of
Health and Social Services, Medicaid and Medical Assistance (35-02-01). The expenditure of these funds shall be used to
support enhanced rates for private, non-pediatric skills nursing facilities beginning on January 1, 2026. This appropriation
may be substituted in whole or in part during the fiscal year by Hospital Quality Assessment dollars, should such funding
Page 25 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/26/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

become available. Enhanced rates shall require the approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and
the Controller General.
Section 22. Section 2 of this Act appropriates $468,176 for Juvenile Civil Citation to Executive, Criminal Justice,
Delaware Justice Information System (10-07-02). The expenditure of these funds shall be contingent upon the passage of
House Bill 220 or similar legislation of the 153rd General Assembly.
Section 23. Section 2 of this Act appropriates $500,000 for Medical Debt Relief to Executive, Office of
Management and Budget, Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11). The expenditure of these funds shall be used to
contract with the nonprofit Undue Medical Debt to partner with providers and select debt collectors to purchase and forgive
debt owed by individuals earning less than 400 percent of the federal poverty level or whose debt exceeds 5 percent of their
annual income.
Section 24. (a) Section 2 of this Act appropriates $550,000 for Right to Representation to Judicial, Administrative
Office of the Courts – Court Services, Office of the State Court Administrator (02-17-01). The expenditure of these funds
shall be used to carry out the services required in 25 Del. C. c. 56, with the funding disbursed contingent upon the
submission of the annual report not later than November 30, 2025, as described in 25 Del. C. § 5605 and upon approval of
the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance Committee.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 69 of Title 29 of the Delaware Code to the contrary, the State Court
Administrator shall provide the Right to Representation Coordinator within Delaware Volunteer Legal Services with the
Right to Representation appropriation in Judicial, Administrative Office of the Courts – Court Services, Office of the State
Court Administrator (02-17-01) to allow the Legal Aid Agencies to provide the services required under Chapter 56 of Title
25 of the Delaware Code.
Section 25. Section 2 of this Act provides a one-time appropriation of appropriates $6,400,000 $3,200,000 for
Statewide Fire Companies and Public Service Ambulance Companies. Of this amount, $100,000 $50,000 shall be provided
to each of the fire companies listed in Section 3(a) of this Act, $100,000 $50,000 shall be provided to the Wilmington Fire
Department, and $100,000 $50,000 shall be provided to each of the public service ambulance companies listed in Section
3(j) of this Act. The State Treasurer is authorized to take the necessary steps to make a total one-time payment of this
appropriation to the aforementioned organizations at the beginning of the first quarter of the fiscal year.
Section 26. (a) Section 2 of this Act appropriates $1,683,329 for Senior Center Transportation Services. For
Fiscal Year 2026, this appropriation shall only be used for the operational expenses of providing transportation services for
homebound senior clients to and from the identified Senior Centers in Kent and Sussex counties. This amount shall be
allocated as follows:
Page 26 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/26/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

Cape Henlopen Senior Center $44,358
CHEER $649,450
Frederica Senior Center $91,564
Harrington Senior Center $37,575
Harvest Years Senior Center $121,748
Indian River Senior Center $2,163
Laurel Senior Center $102,055
Lewes Senior Center $27,937
Mamie Warren Senior Center $25,559
Milford Senior Center $119,467
Modern Maturity Center $415,142
Nanticoke Senior Center $46,311
(b) The payments of allocations in subsection (a) shall be made pursuant to Section 8 of this Act and Section
6505(d) of Title 29 of the Delaware Code.
(c) For Fiscal Year 2027 and beyond, it is the intent of the Joint Finance Committee that the appropriation for
Senior Center Transportation Services will become an electronic application process managed by the Controller General’s
Office. Eligibility criteria and application requirements will be determined by the Joint Finance Committee Co-Chairs and
announced to the public on the Grant-in-Aid website and registered users of the Controller General’s Office Grants
Management System so that eligible applicants can submit an annual electronic application by the deadline noticed in the
Controller General’s Office Grants Management System consistent with other Grants-in-Aid applications.
Section 27. Section 2 of this Act makes provides an appropriation to the Delaware State Fair. Of that amount,
$5,000 shall be used for purses on Governor’s Day and shall be paid by the State Treasurer at the beginning of the first
quarter of each fiscal year. The remainder of the appropriation shall be paid in quarterly allotments, as provided in § 6505
of Title 29 of the Delaware Code, and used for prizes for achievements in agriculture, animal raising, and in works of
manual training and the domestic arts to be awarded at the annual State Fair.
Section 28. Notwithstanding any other law or provision to the contrary, the University of Delaware may not make
payments for utility bills and building permit fees owed to the City of Newark through the use of a credit card.
Section 29. (a) Amend § 1195, Title 30 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through
and insertions as shown by underline as follows:
§ 1195. Senior Trust Fund.
Page 27 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/26/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

(a) An individual who claims an overpayment of taxes on an income tax return may designate that $1.00 or
more be deducted from the refund that would otherwise be payable to the individual and, instead be paid to
the Senior Trust Fund as established pursuant to § 4101(i) of Title 11 [repealed]. The Division of Revenue
shall determine the total amount designated pursuant to this subsection and shall transfer such amount to the
Senior Trust Fund.
(b) An individual who has an income tax liability may, in addition to the liability, include a donation of $1.00
or more to be paid to the Senior Trust Fund as established pursuant to § 4101(i) of Title 11 [repealed]. The
Division of Revenue shall determine the total amount designated pursuant to this subsection and shall transfer
such amount to the Senior Trust Fund.
(c) The Division of Revenue shall provide a space on the Delaware income tax return form whereby an
individual may voluntarily designate a contribution of an amount of $1.00 or more to the Senior Trust Fund.
(d) The amount designated by an individual on the income tax return form shall be deducted from the tax
refund to which the individual is entitled, or the amount designated may be added to the individual’s payment
of taxes due, but the amount may not be included in the general revenue of the State.
(b) Subsection (a) of this Section takes effect for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.
(c) Notwithstanding 84 Del. Laws, c. 361. § 1, the Senior Trust Fund is reestablished for purposes of
receiving donations made under § 1195 of Title 30 of the Delaware Code for the tax year beginning on
January 1, 2024, and ending on December 31, 2024.
(d) Any balance remaining in the Senior Trust Fund may be utilized by the Department of Health and
Social Services, Division of Services for Aging and Adults with Physical Disabilities (35-14-00) in providing
assistance to the senior population.
Section 30. Amend § 1902, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and
insertions as shown by underline as follows:
§ 1902. Power of district to levy taxes for school purposes.
(a) Any district may, in addition to the amounts apportioned to it by the Department of Education or appropriated
to it by the General Assembly, levy and collect additional taxes for school purposes upon the assessed value of all taxable
real estate in the district, except any of the following:
(9) Real estate owned by the Central Delaware Housing Collaborative.
Section 31. Amend the Fiscal Year 2026 One-Time Supplemental Appropriations Act (House Bill 226 of the
153rd General Assembly) by deleting Section 5 thereof in its entirety and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
Page 28 of 29
CG: RAM: JFC Released: 06/26/2025 01:57 PM
0211530010

“Section 5. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $15,200 for Survey to Judicial, Administrative
Office of the Courts – Non-Judicial Services, Delaware Nursing Home Residents Quality Assurance Commission (02-18-
07). The expenditure of these funds shall be used for the purposes of conducting a resident, family, and staff engagement
and satisfaction research survey among Delaware’s assisted living and skilled nursing facilities. To any extent necessary,
the provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall not apply.”
Section 32. Notwithstanding the provisions of 14 Del. C. § 1028(k), § 1916, § 1924, and § 1925, beginning in
Fiscal Year 2026, the Department of Education shall administer the New Castle County Tax District such that each district
in the pool contribute the amount of revenue equal to that contributed in Fiscal Year 2025 and shall receive a share of the
pooled revenue equal to the amount received in Fiscal Year 2025.
Section 33. Contingent on the enactment of House Substitute No. 1 for House Bill No. 91 and notwithstanding
Section 2 of House Substitute No. 1 for House Bill No. 91, House Substitute No. 1 for House Bill No. 91 takes effect
immediately and is to be implemented beginning July 1, 2025.
Section 34. Amend the Fiscal Year 2026 Appropriations Act (House Bill 225 of the 153rd General Assembly) by
deleting Section 345 thereof in its entirety and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
“Section 345. Pursuant to provisions of 14 Del. C. § 1902(b), all local districts shall be authorized to assess a local
match for Fiscal Year 2010 Reading Resource Teachers and Mathematics Resource Teachers/Specialists and Fiscal Year
2008 Extra Time. Amend Title 14 of Delaware Code, § 1902 with deletions as shown by strikethrough and insertions as
shown by underline as follows:
(c) Pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (b) of this section, all local districts shall be authorized to assess a local
match for Fiscal Year 2010 Reading Resource Teachers and Mathematics Resource Teachers/Specialists and Fiscal Year
2008 Extra Time.”